Utah statutes.
10-8-79.   Creating offices -- Filling vacancies.

They may create any office they may deem necessary for the good government of the city, and provide for filling vacancies in elective and appointive offices, and prescribe the powers, duties and compensation of all officers of the city, except as otherwise provided by law.

